Missouri, session 2026, SB1136.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 182, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 182.910, to read as
follows:
182.910. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Digital library material" or "digital library
materials", includes, but is not limited to, digital
audiobooks, electronic books, electronic textbooks,
electronic journals, electronic magazines and periodicals,
databases, digital test preparation resources, digital
vocational and career resources, digital reference
resources, digital readers' advisory resources, streaming
video, and academic software programs that are directly
accessible through the public library or school library
database, excluding any online or digital content available
to patrons or students outside of the public library or
school library database or platform;
(2) "Library material" or "library materials", any
resource in print or non-print format that is found in a
public library or school library and that supports

SB 1136 2
curricular or personal information needs, including, but not
limited to, books, magazines, newspapers, pamphlets,
microfiche, microfilm, films, disc records, filmstrips,
slides, prints, audio recordings, video recordings, compact
discs, computer software, library programs, and exhibits;
(3) "Reconsideration", a process in which library
personnel, public schools, school districts, or library
governing bodies review materials in the public library or
school library due to a formal complaint filed by a member
of the community. The outcome of this reconsideration may
include relocating or removing library materials or removing
or restricting access to digital library materials;
(4) "Relocating", removing materials from one part of
the library, such as the children's section, and moving them
to another part of the library, such as the adult section;
(5) "School library", a library located in an
attendance center of a public school district.
2. A public library or school library shall establish
a policy that is publicly available and posted in a public
location and on the website of the school district or
governing body of the public library that outlines the
process for library materials and digital library materials
to undergo reconsideration based on a complaint made about
library materials or digital library materials from a member
of the community.
3. A public library or school library shall respond to
a reconsideration request by removing library materials from
its permanent collection, relocating library materials
within its collection, or removing or restricting access to
digital library materials within its collection only if the
materials have been reviewed in accordance with an
established policy for the reconsideration of library

SB 1136 3
materials and digital library materials that complies with
the requirements of this section.
4. To make a request for reconsideration of library
materials or digital library materials, the individual
making the request shall sign an affidavit affirming that:
(1) Such individual has read or consumed the entirety
of the challenged material; and
(2) Such individual permanently resides in:
(a) The taxing district of the public library in which
the request is made; or
(b) The school district in which the request is made.
5. Each public library or school library shall develop
an appeals process for the reconsideration policy that
outlines a process for appealing a decision made regarding
the removal of library materials or digital library
materials. This appeals process shall provide for a final
decision on each appeal to be made by a local elected
official or group of officials.
6. Digital library materials that undergo
reconsideration shall be subject to removal or restricted
access at the title, issue, and article level. Any third
party contracted to provide databases that contain or
provide access to digital library materials shall have the
ability to curate those materials using a mechanism or tool
that allows for the removal or restriction of access to
challenged content without disrupting access to the
remainder of digital library materials accessible in the
public library or school library. Curation of digital
library materials shall not be applied at an individual user
level, but shall be applied at the library system or school
district level.

SB 1136 4
7. Digital library resources shall not track or
monitor the access of library materials or digital library
materials by individual users, including minors, including
any tracking or monitoring to personalize experiences within
the library resources.
8. An individual who is a librarian, media specialist,
other employee, contractor, or volunteer of a public library
or school library shall not be subject to termination,
demotion, discipline, retaliation, or any other penalty for
refusing to remove library materials or digital library
materials before such materials have been reviewed in
accordance with a public library or school library policy
that complies with the provisions of this act.
✓